Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 177.254, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Meal break waiver. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 3, an employee may voluntarily waive a mandatory meal break required under this section. An employer must pay an employee for time worked during a meal break waived under this paragraph. new text end new text begin (b) A meal break waiver request: new text end new text begin (1) must be made to the employer electronically or in writing; and new text end new text begin (2) may be revoked by an employee for any shift where reasonable notice is provided to the employer. new text end new text begin (c) An employer must not require an employee to waive a meal break required under this section. new text end